Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF782.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 97B.645, subdivision 9, is amended to read: Subd. 9. Open season. deleted text begin There shall be nodeleted text end new text begin (a) The commissioner must prescribe an annualnew text end open season for wolves deleted text begin until afterdeleted text end new text begin unlessnew text end the wolf is deleted text begin delisteddeleted text end new text begin listednew text end under the federal Endangered Species Act of 1973. deleted text begin After that time, the commissioner may prescribe open seasons and restrictions for taking wolves but must provide opportunity for public comment.deleted text end new text begin The season, restrictions, and any other requirements must be consistent with the goals identified in the wolf management plan adopted under section 97B.646.new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner must annually consult with the commissioner of agriculture and the United States Department of Agriculture, Animal and Plant Health Inspection Service, before determining the season, restrictions, and other requirements of the open season required under this section. The consultation must include a review of available data on wolf depredation on livestock and pets and other incidents of human conflict. new text end